Bikiker reacts lightning speed and prevents worse
On Friday evening, a traffic accident occurred on the highway between Machtolsheim and Merklingen, in which a motorcyclist was only slightly injured thanks to his quick reaction.
Driver overlooks biker
A 430 year-old motorist wanted to turn left from 30 30 her her 30 Mer30 Mer30 straße 30 straße 1230 towards Machtolsheim.
She overlooked the 24year-old motormotormotorcwho from forward from Nellingen.
Hand and foot brake lever fly away during collision
The biker tried to avoid the car car but still touched it at the rear vehicle area.
Due to the stripping process, the hand and foot brake levers were lilion the SuSuzuki and the driver was no longer able to brake.
He currently stehis motorcycle in the green stiffnext next to roadroad and let it roll out there without falling down.
Bikker suffers leg injury
Due to the collision with the car, the biker suffered an injury to the time and had to be treated in a clinic.
Mamming: Corona mass infection: 174 harpers infected
After a Corona mass infection on a large vegetable farm in Mamming, Lower Bavaria, almost 500 people are quarquarined and are no longer allowed to leave the farm.
A security service monitors the ban.
A total of 174 harvestpers were tested for the Corona pathogen SarSarCoV-V-2 during series series, as according by the DingDingLandLandLandLandau on Saturday evening.
"In order to avoid further spread, we must to take this step to protect the population," explained District rat Werner Bumeder (CSU).
Previously, seven employees had already become infected in the company - this was the occasion of the series test.
The farm is a large vegetable farm that grows strawberries, cucumbers, cabbage and beetroot - but the cucumbers only for inlay glasses.
Mamming is a rural municipality with a good 3300 inhabitants not far from Dingolfing with its large BMW plant.
Bumeder appealed to the citizens to keep calm: "According to our information, it is a closed group of people".
On the farm, infected were separated by uninfected employees, the site is now surrounded by a fence.
The Greens and SPD gave shared responsibility to the state government.
The two opposition groups accused Prime Minister Markus Söder (CSU) and his cabinet of neglecting the the accommodation seasonal seasonal workers.
"This can take rererevenge if such local infection take take and and regional regional downs have to be ordered," said Jürgen Mistol, parliamentary parliamentary director of the Greens.
The SPD sees this very similar:: "the Corona outbreak in the WiesWiesslaughlaughhouse in in May May we have already already demanded a special control program for farms with harvesters," said environmental expert Florian von Brunn.
"In our view, the hygiene conditions conditions at workplace workplace and the living conditions must be be ply ly ored.
This obviously happened. "
The outbreak came "with announcement".
Aground bachstraße idenbachstraße: Dangerous dispute: 19-year-old falls into the track bed after Schubser
In a dispute between two youth groups at the subway bachstraße idenbachstraße, a 19-year-old fell through a drawer and slipped into the track bed.
Obersendling - On Friday, was was a dispute between two groups at at underground underground station idenidenstraße straße straße 4.15 p.m.
A passers-by alerted the police, who approached with several stripes.
According to the first investigation, a Munich (17) pushed a 19-year-old to the ground.
The young man slipped over the platform edge and fell into the track bed.
People from the 17-year-old group helped the the to climb out of the track.
There was no danger from a coming railway.
According to the police, there were clashes between the two people.
The 17-year-old initially fled from the crime scene, but his personal materials could be determined in retrospect.
Accompanied by his father, he went to the police inspection 29.
The 17-year-old is investigfor physical injury.
Report: Seehofer pushes for longer data storage
Data storage is currently suspended.
According, a media the however, Federal Federal Minister Interior Interior Horst SeSeehofer calls for an extension of the storage period.
He wants to strengthen the fight against child abuse.
According to media media report, Federal Minister ofHorst Horst ehehofer (CSU) calls for an data storage - instead of the planned ten the planned ten weeks.
As reported by Bild Bild Bild "Sunday, SeSeofofMinister of Justice Christine Lambrecht (SPD) asked in a letter for a quick change in the law.
Seehofer wants to strengthen measures against child abuse.
He considers it makes sense to "make urgently needed adjustments in the law already," the newspaper quotnewspaper from the letter.
Data storage is currently suspended.
A ECJ J decision is expected.
Seehofer, however, wants the changes beforehand, so that they be be applied immediately after a positive positive judgment, the report continues.
A spokesman for the Ministry of Justice told the newspaper that it could only be to examined whether legal adjustments were needed if the courts had decided.
In the fight against child abuse and child pornography, Seehofer, together with with interior interior ministers the the countries, had already in out of data storage in June.
NBA: Stripclub anger for Clipper Star Lou Williams
Excitement in the NBA!
Lou Williams (33), basketball professional of the Los Angeles Clippers, is said to have left the tournament headquarters in Disney World in Orlando, Florida with permission for a funeral.
According to US media reports, he visited the strip club "Magic City" in Atlanta in the evening.
Williams, who is said to have admitted the visit according to ESPN information, is back in Isloation, is tested daily on Covid-19.
His reason for the visit: Chicken Wings.
In February last year, "Sweet Lou", as it is called in the NBA, already expressed his love for exactly these wings.
The American wrote: "Magic City and Blue Flame have the best wings in city."
NBA insider Shams Charania announced on Twitter on Sunday that the NBA Williams Williams ordered a ten-day quarantine.
The Clippers Star thus ses the first two official games after the test game phase.
In Disney World, the NBA wants to play the Corona season.
Currently, the best 22 teams with training games are preparing for the season finale starting on night on Friday.
Söder comments on the Corona situation after mass ectone
Munich - Health Minister Melanie Huml (CSU) has already announced a test offensive for large farms on Sunday.
The press conference will be shown live on our homepage.
The case in Mamming in the district of Dingolfing-Landau has scghtened authorities and politics.
Almost 500 crop vestfrom from several countries currently working on the large vegetable farm, more than a third third become infected with the Corona pathogen.
The farm is now under quarantine and is closed with a building fence.
No body is allowed to leave the grounds, food is delivered.
The authorities now offer the Corona tests of 300 300 free Corona tests.
Since the harvestpers had little contact with the local population, the Landratsamt so far assassumed that the infections have not spread beyond the farm.
"Conmorse": Confession of the alleged arsonson of Nantes
"My client has been cooperative," lawyer lawyer Quentin Chabert told the newspaper.
The defender added, "He greatly regrets the deeds, the confession was a liberation for him."
His mandate was "plagued by remorse and very away by the extent of destruction".
According to the prosecution,, the the man is is is is sentenced of a years imprison15and a fine of a conviction.
The Gothic St. Peter and Paul Cathedral in Nantes was severely damaged by a fire the night of Saturday last Saturday.
The fire had broken out in three distant places in the church.
Laboratory investigations confirmed the suspicion of arson.
The now imprisoned suspect had been arrested arrested a few hours after the fire.
He was released after a day.
The man works as a volunteer for the diocese of Nantes and was responsible for the closure of the cathedral on the eve of the fire.
Since there was no trace of a violent penetration into the church, he quickly came into the eye of the investigators.
Discuss the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule
Former DFB President Reinhard Grindel has recommended thinking on the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule.
"German football should at least discuss, setting conditions and clear rules for investors before the EU Commission creates facts acaccomplshed," GrinGrindel the "Bild on Sunday".
He stressed: "For the clubs that can not most dangerous to Bavaria and dangerous, the 50 + 1 rules do not dangerous anyway: see Leipzig or Leverkusen.
In this respect, there debate no avoid the debate whether it is not to to facilitate the involvement of investors break break that want break into this inclusion anx. "
However, he has doubts as to to there is a willingness in the German Football League to allow majority majority eholdings, which are prohibited in the Bundesliga by the 50 + 1 rule.
"It remains a legal risk to draw investment fences around a Bundeslocation business location in a European internal market," said Grindel.
The former DFB head sees sees risk that "" attempts attempts to a competitive balance in in BundesBundesBundesultimately only weakaken the competitiveness of our top clubs at European level, but do not lead to more excitement in the championship ".
Even equal distribution of TV funds will have no decisive effect.
"FC Bayern genera sales of 750 million euros, Borussia Dortmund of 500 million and RB Leipzig of 300 million.
The differences are already immense among the first three clubs alone.
The other 15 clubs have an average budget of 130 million, "said the 58-year-old.
Looking at the past, Grindel feels betrayed.
"Unfortunately, there were people who noticed this mistake and stabierto the press instead of addresme me, GrinGrindel del about accepting an expensive watch that led to his resignation in April 2019.
"I really me me very busy."
He received the gift worth around 11,000 euros from a Ukrainian official.
"I committed a compliance violation, and it was right to draw the consequences from it," GrinGrindel.
"I dealt with the ominous watch gift completely transparent transparent and suspably.
Many in the DFB knew about it. "
He had 8-" made a secret of the gift, "the sured the 58-sured.
"This may be called naive, in any case, this form of transparency was the complete opposite of corruption."
"Black Lives Matter": injured and a dead
The protests against police violence in the United States have reored ated by Donald Trump ’ s deployment of federal police in several cities.
On Saturday, there were clashes in various cities and protators in various cities.
Three people were injured in Louisville and 16 16 arrested in Seattle.
In Austin, a person was killed by shots while a demonstration train just crossed a crossing.
Previously, clhad had clclashes in Portland during protests against racism and police violence.
The security forces, including Federal police officials, used tear gas on the night of Saturday and fored bly demonstresters demonstresters.
Hundreds, partly armed demonstrators marched through Louisville in Kentucky on Saturday and demanded that those responsible for the death of Breonna Taylor be held accountable.
The 26-year-old student was shot in a drug raid drug her home in Louisville in March.
The aim of the raid was someone else who did not live there, and no drugs were found.
On Saturday Saturday, a member of a group that calling itself as an armed alliance of black Americans fired a shot, three people were injured.
According to NBC, they were taken to the hospital.
None of them were in mortmortdanger.
The police set up barricades because countercounterdemonstrators of a white militia had miliformed.
In timately, there was no meeting of the two groups.
In Austin, Texas, a person was shot and died in the part of a "Black Lives Matter" demonstration.
The police took a suspect into custody.
She has not yet any further information on the circumstances of the crime.
Mayor Steve Adler New York Times, Mayor York Times Times that he, many many in the city, was "inconsolable and stunned" of what had happened.
In the American metropolis of Seattle, too, demonstrprotalso also in clashes with the police on Saturday.
They set fire on construction cars in front of a youth prison, the police used used are grenades and pepper spray.
According to the Seattle Times, 16 people were arrested for resistance to police or physical ault.
A courthouse was set on fire in the city of Oakland, California.
A small group of demonstrators took windows, fishot fireworks works and blinded police police with laslas, the OOland police said on late Saturday evening (local time).
The fire was quickly extinguished.
In Aurora, a suburb of Denver, Colorado, a car drove through a crowd demonstrating on a highway.
According to the police, one of the protfifired a gun and at least one person was taken to the hospital in injured.
In addition, windows were also in in a court and a fire was fire, as the police said.
Invesinvestigation.
Rakoczy in Bad Kissingen: Historical costumes defy Corona
Although the big break in the spa town was missing, visitors and performers enjoyed the Rakoczy flair of the alternative program.
It was unusual for visitors, performers and organizers: The Rakoczy weekend without a Rakoczy festival.
But: even though the big party mile in the city center was missing, the crowds and program ghts such as Saale ale ale, Rakocyball or or procade, many came got money's worth in the Corona-compliant alternative program.
"I think we have succeeded in spreading Rakoczy flair," says course Director Sylvie Thormann.
The guests would have accepted it well.
In principle, one returns to the beginnings of the Rakoczy festival, as as the the historical were were the focus of the festival.
Pleasant atmosphere
Vesna Konhäuser has been husband always always Bad KisKisKisFestival Bad Kissingen for more than 25 years.
So this time in the Corona year.
The couple have made themselves comfortable at the Luitpold Casino, watthe the historans while strolling and listens to the Cuban live music at the casino restaurant.
"I find it pleasant," says Konhäuser.
They do not miss the crowds that otherwise belong to Rakoczy.
But it lthe usual usual highlights highlights especially especially Saale burns on Friday evening as well as the historic procade and the closing firedisplay on Sunday evening.
"That's a pity.
The weather would have been great this year, "she says.
Rakoczy riding tournament to take place again
For the actors of the historical spa guests, the alternative program sometimes meant more work.
For example, for Christina Gold, who participates in the procession in a normal year and can be seen there on the carriage of the Kurgarten café.
This year she was on on in city city on Saturdays and Sundays.
"That's more exhausting, otherwise we have it easier," she says.
The equestrian association had less to do, even if individual riders were on the road in the park.
"We very much hope that the equestrian quadrille will take place again next year," says Chairman Ulrike Waldhofen.
She announced that after several years of break break in 2021, a Rakoczy equestrian tournament would take take again.
28 Corona cases in Spanish division Fuenlabrada
Spanish Spanish second division division CF Fuenlabrada rada slides deeper and deeper into the crisis due to a Corona outbreak.
Since the newcomer near Madrid Madrid flelown to the Corcity A A Corña ña ña ña the the CorCorona Coron 20,, one low low follows the next.
By Sunday, 28 players or team members had been positive, one came to the hospital, the club said.
Fuenlabrada from the city of the same name southwest southwest Madrid Madrid still had chance chance to the the promotion playoffs.
They is even to egegegthe the ated of the Second League.
The game against Deportivo La Coruña last Monday was cancelled at the last moment, the prosecutinvestiginvestiginvestiginvestigating a possible possible against public health, the supreme sports authority CSD is considering the forced egation of the club.
Players and other team members sit quarantine in a hotel.
"Until the sixth day of quarantine, they have not received a fresh towel and gel," wrote the sports newspaper "AS".
Photos show how players hung underwear and club clothing in their rooms in the hotel for hotel after they apparently had to wash them themselves.
The linen was also changed for five days.
Another problem is eating.
Neither it it good nor sufficient, wrote "AS".
The club club, on the other hand, said that they was satisfied with the hotel.
The club's lawyer, Javier TebebLlanas rejected rejected the usof deliberately ately angering public health.
The son ona rules the the the mera Division, not football eb,, the son the the of the Spanish not mermerDivision, JaJaTebeb,, as the the news agency news Press and the sports newspaper "Marca association.
Before the departure, there were four infected people by 19 July, but of whom were isolated and did not not along.
Immediately before the flight on A CorA ña uña, all players and team members had been re-tested.
When the team was already in A Coruña, the Corona test was positive for "five or six" other team members.
The game was cancelled 60 minutes before the kick-off, TTebLlanlansaid.
Police must capture horses puln n at steam compartment
Two animals were on the road.
The police led her back to her owner.
On Sunday morning, shortly before 6 o'clock, a road user shared two free-running horses on the feeder eder the confluence of Donnersdorf / Steinfeld feld and the Therjunction Therjunction.
At the arrival of the officials, the horses were already again between the feeder and the village of Dampfach.
After the trust of the horses could be by the the shortly shortly before steam compartment, they rope rope rope rope rope in the patrol car.
Cyclilist Tony Martin: Career continuation imaginable
Time-trial specialist Tony Martin thinthinking about a continuation of his career.
Frankfurt / Main - Sevven-time time trial world champion Tony Martin can imagine continuing his cycling career.
"I am currently working the framework conditions with the team on how and in what form it could continue," said the 35-year-old of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Sonntagszeitung".
Martin is currently employed by the Dutch team Jumbo-Visma and had considered his his career after this year before the Corona break.
Negotiations with his team are also about the number of race days, he said.
Or about problems problems that would plague him as a father of a family, Martin said.
He used to get up after a fall and the first thought was: "Fast back to the bike.
Today, as the father of a little daughter, I think: what if ".
The cyccadmitted admitted that there there certainly aspects with which he was increasingly increasingly with.
"But I was good to see what the Corona time how I fun in cycling and how much fun I doing."
The time trial specialist enters the competition at the Tour de l'Ain (5 to 9 August).
Bavaria: At least four dead on Bavaria's streets on weekends
The beautiful weather attracts bikers on the streets in many places.
For at least three people, the tour ends motorcycle motorcycle ends fatmotorcycle.
An 18-year-old pedestrian also dies.
Schönthal - In case of accidents on Bavaria's streets, several, mostly young people died on the weekend.
An 18-year-old motorcyclist was captured on Saturday near Schönthal (Cham ham) by a car that came on the counter lane.
Why the car was the track track was initially untrack.
In Upper Bavaria, a 22-year-old colded with a hora hordrawn age on his machine on Saturday.
According to the police, he was downhill at Beilngries.
In a left turn he he unced against the carriage.
His injuries were so severe that he died at the scene of the accident.
Of the twelve inmates of the carriage, a man was severand a man was slightly injured, as the police reported.
In another fatal accident, an 18-year-old died in Bad ötzting ting Upper Upper Upper Palatinate.
He had laid on on a street the night of Sunday and was overrun by a 442-year-old motorist.
According to the police, the 18-year-old wanted to sleep.
The driver could not brake in time.
At Schönberg (Freyung-Grafenfenau), a 57 57 57 ker ker ker ed a a a a car in a right despite despite full braking.
He died at the scene of the accident.
The 57-year-old driver was a shock and the remaining three people in the car were uninjured.
The safety of motorcyclists was discussed on Saturday by Bavaria Minister Transport Minister Kerstin Schreyer (CSU).
In a letter to the organizer of the biker protests announced for August ans driving for August, Gabor KovacAugust, the minister pointed to extensive investments such as underride protection on guardardand the defdefof dangerous dangerous corners.
"We have achieved a lot for the safety of motorcyclists in recent years," said the letter.
"The number of motorized two-cyclists killed decreased by around 28 percent compared to 2011."
Kovac tests with Monaco against Frankfurt
Frankfurt / Main (dpa) - For football coach Niko Kovac, there will soon be a reunion with Eintracht Frankfurt with his new Club AS Monaco.
The eight-time French champion will perform on HAugust (6 p.m.) at the Hessen, the August (the Cro).
For the Bundesliga team, it is the first and only hardurance test before the second leg in the Europa League against FC Basel (6 August).
Because of the Coronavirus pandemic, the encounter is held without spectators.
"We are especially looking forward to this game.
It is always nice to come to Frankfurt and meet friends, "explained ovac ac.
Sporty, this is an interesting test, said the 48-year-old.
Prior to joining FC Bayern Bayern München, ovovac had trained the Hesse from 2016 to 2018 and led to the victory in the DFB-Pokal.
"A top-profile opponent like Monaco is a good test for us for the game against Basel.
Like all Frankfurt in,, I look forward to seeing you again with Niko Kovac, "said Eintracht coach Adi Hütter.
The 50-year-old Austrian had succeeded the Croat at Eintracht.
In March, the Frankfurt lost lost the round round round first leg against Basel in their own in their own stadium.
Almost 50 new infections: Landkreis Hof just past the Lockdown
In the district of Hof, the number of new Corona new infections has further increased on the weekend: from 39 on Friday and 43 on Saturday (one person has recovered and no longer falls into these statististatistics) to 47 on Sunday.
In addition, there is a case in the city of Hof.
Thus, Hof Hof Hof is aching the critical mark of 50 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants in one week.
700 deaths due to monsoon raall in Southeast Asia
The severe floods in Southeast Asia affect more than 9 million people, especially in Bangladesh, India and Nepal.
A total of 700 people were killed because to the strong monsoon rain.
In Bangladesh, the Red Crescent tries to reach the isolated people in boats.
Whole villages are under water.
The farmers have lost their harvests.
Tank ros in National Park die from landslides
In Kaziranga National Park, several of the 120 tank ros died from landslides.
They are under protection and are as endangered by extinction.
This year, the floods are particularly bad, which scientists are attriback to climate change.
According to the United Nations, Bangladesh is one of the most countries hit by global warming.
New apartments empty
In the village of Cox's Bazaar in the south of Bangladesh, the state has built apartments for 650 displacdisplaced by the floods.
Only a few have moved so far.
It is difficult to bring people to Cox's Bazaar.
Also enthusiasm enthusiasm in Grenezn.
Anyone used used to have a house, it was also small small and resemlike a hut, often does not want to spend their life in a large block of living.
Many apartments are empty, but - the government government - soon soon be be from those who have lost their house due to the floods.
60 Corona new infections in just one day in Vienna
In a 24-hour comparison, 60 Corona new infections were reported in Vienna - there were 22 new infections in Lower Austria.
The Vienna essanitätsDirecktion Vienna and the medical crisis staff of the City of Vienna regularly provide information about the current case figures and key key figures the the vivi19 19 virus: as of Sunday, 26 July 2020, 8 00 a.m., 4,840 (+ 60) positive have been confirmed in Vienna.
The number of deaths related to the virus is unchanged 204.
4,090 (+ 48) persons have recovered.
22 new coronavirus infections in Lower Austria
The number of coronavirus infections in Lower Austria rose by 22 to 3,288 on Sunday.
According to the medical staff, a patient has recovered recovered.
This increases the number of genes to 2,936.
Currently vid-19 were currently 2424patients patients in state.
To date, 147,253 tests have been carried out.
105 people died in connection with lung disease.
Argentina rejects credicreditors
The new demands could not be met, the Ministry of Economy in Buenos Aires said on Saturday.
"This would be not only irresponsible, but also unjust," said statement statement.
"While 50 percent of children in Argentina live in poverty, we cannot increase the short-term profits of our creditors."
The debts of the second largest economy in South America is no longer viable to the current conditions.
This is why Argentina is on its private creditors to frave some of their ables of around 66 billion US dollars (around 59 billion euros).
If there is no reached, the country is once again threatened with state bankruptcy.
It would be the ninth default in Argentine history.
Finally, lders demanded higher higher rates on government bonds and changes to some contractual clauses.
However Argentthe Argentine government is holding cking to its offer offer and is not ready make any further concessions.
Argentina is in a serious financial and economic crisis.
The inflation rate was more than 50 percent.
For the current year, experts expect around ten to decline by around ten percent.
At the end of May, Argentina had not paid interest interest 3 of million 3 3 3 and and slipped into a limited default.
Arriarrived - private not yet
"It's going well well" - this conclusion Dr. by Dr. Stefanie Kramer after her first days in the notary esary in Eggenfelden.
In the end, everything went very quickly: In mid-May, Dr. Stefanie Kramer learned that she will succeed Lutz Feller at the EggengenfelNotariary office.
Just six weeks later, at the beginning of July, the lawyer who received doctorate torate took work work, the normal day-to-day business has long been running on full speed.
"However, I have to arrive privprivate," she explains in conversation with the Rottaler Anzeiger and laughs.
The short lead time short of course not enough enough to the the focus of life completely from Regensburg EgEggenfelden, reports the native ingingfingwoman.
Currently, she is her husband, who who as a a in at the the court court Regensburg, is looking for a suitable apartment or a house in the city.
At least her husband was still to apply apply parental leave at short term in order to ensure the care of the two daughters (3 ½ and 1 ½ years old).
In order to not have to commute every Regensburg from Regensburg, she also also has an to stay with her parents in Dingolfing, explains the 9-9-year-old.
Growing up in the neighbouring ing,, the city EgEggenfelden has of long been familiar to it.
During visits visits with her family in recent months, she she again discovered: "Eggenfelden is a really nice small town".
She was all all the more pleased that she had made the race in the selection process for vacanancy.
Her home Lower Bavaria also plays plays a central role in Dr. StefStefKramer professional career: After studying studying in Passau, she completed her her tratraeship and the 2nd state examination in Regensburg.
After several positions as a notary assess,, among others RehRehau Hof in Upper Franconia ia Babenhausen ausen the Unterallgäu and Regensburg Regensburg during during this she she also "" "" doctorate in labour law - she took her first job as a notary in Rotthalmünster in the district of Passau in 2012.
In 2016, she went on parental leave, and followed by the move to Regensburg.
Since then, she has taken over representation services in various notarial offices.
When the 3in Eggenfelden was advertised because of the approaching retirement of Lutz Feller, she had the right time time come the the professional career career, explains the 39-year-old.
The team of her predecessor, who will take over the holiday representation in the notarioffice in in the future, taken taken over Dr. StefStefStefKrKrand and has has praise for the team of the firm firm: "It is going superwell!"
The fact that she can rely on well-rehearsed processes makes it easier for her to take care of the upcoming upcoming of the private private point of food.
In terms of kindergarten and criativity places, she has already made contact with a local institution.
And if everything works as desired, she hopes to be able to pursue her hobby here here - and to get to know the most beautiful jogging routes of the Rottal.
BVB plans to league league with a maximum of 15,000 spectators
Dortmund The largest German football stadium in Dortmund will not even be 20 percent filled at the start of the season in the event of a fan return.
"Due to the distance control, which is be complied,, we are currently planning 1212,000 ,000 ,000 ,000 specators ators," BorBorsia Dortmund Dortmund managing director Carsten Cramram, the "Tagesspiegel".
Normally, the arena in the district holds holds just than 81,000 spectators at Bundesliga matches.
In the season's ghost games caused by the Corona pandemic, BVB had lost about four million euros per game.
The Cramer, is is BBB for Marketing Marketing,, tizalization alization Internationalization alization hopes, in addition addition the normal normal tt,, some of 4,4,4,places places in the sector can can again opened opened "" It It of course a a low low the the office if these revenues break completely completely ".
In view of the ongoing Corona crisis, everyone is currently "well advised to take a stable side length".
"If many companies are not doing well and 6.8 million people in Germany alone are in in Germany alone, then the need is entertainment is entertainment," explained ramramer.
The Dortmund Marketing oss oss praised the VB professionals professionals for their salary ary waiwai, which is supposed to overcome overcome overcome crisis "" Of course, players players know that their ary ary waihas has a different effect than than we 100 100 people working in merchandising on short-time work. "
Tiny wonders: Early start into life with a few hundred grams
Hardly heavier than a packer butter, just three tablespoons of blood throughout his body: that was Gabriel when he was born - he weighed exactly 273 grams.
The bus is one of about 400 premature babies that are cared ed annually at the Graz Graz's Clinic.
A quarter of them weis less than 1,500 grams, a few - like Gabriel and his brothers Raphael and Michael - are extreme weights with not even a kilogram of birth weight.
They are born so small and so early that neither lungs nor intestines, nor muscles are fully developed.
Their skin is sometimes so delicate that they could hurt the electrodes of an ECG.
And they are so tiny that they sometimes wear doll clothing and mini diapers specially made for them.
But not so small that they were not in voice - "and how", smiles Berndt Urlesberger.
"Even if they don't screscream as loudly as big babies..
When the whiteboard becomes a stage
Despite Corona ona in in classclass:: whiteboard as a stage experienced experienced 9th 9th of the St. St. St. School AbAbtsgmünmünshortly before the start of the holiday.
Actress Julia Sylvester from the Theater der Stadt Aalen presented the production "Das Heimatkleid" to the students - by video.
Afterwards, the students were able to talk the the and and performance via Skype with the actress Winfried Tobias fried Tobias.
The idea for the performance format format from the current situation ona situation.
Teacher Teresa Nar was happy about the enrichment of teaching.
Even though all the involved at the involved that that direct direct in in theatre and and stage would would offer additional stimuli, the can also see the potential for contact contact for schools in the theatre.
"If we further improve the technical framework, this could be an interesting addition to the game," stressed director Winfried Tobias.
First round drawn: TSV 1860 would meet Eintracht Frankfurt in the DFB-Pokal
Should TSV 1860 qualifies for the DFB-Pokal, the lions meet Eintracht Frankfurt in the first round.
This was the result of the draw on Sunday.
Munich - Sixty possible opponents in the first round of the DFB-Pokal has been determined.
The lions would meet Eintracht Frankfurt during a successful qualification.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday evening in the ARD Sports Show.
Because the field of participants is not yet complete complete to the Corona pandemcomplete, placeholders were used in the draw.
Due to the voluntary renonof semi-semi-opponents FC Memmingen, TSV 1860 is already in the final of the Bavarian Toto Cup (4 or 5 September).
There the lions meet either the Würzburg Kickers or Viktoria Aschaffenburg.
Should the division division eger Würzburg reach the final, sixty would already be qualified for the first round in the DFB-Pokal.
Otherwise, the Giesinger would have to prevail in the final against regional alliist Aschaffenburg.
The first round of the DFB-Pokal will take place between 11 and 14 September and thus one week before the start of the third league.
"Gone by the Wind": Film legend Olivia de Havilland is dead
Film legend and Oscar winner Olivia de Havilland is dead.
She died a natural death on Sunday in Paris at the age of 104, confirmed her spokeswoman of the German Press Agency.
de Havilland was known for her role as Melanie Hamilton in the southern epic "Gone by the Wind" (1939).
Born in Tokyo as the child of British parents, Olivia de Havilland moved to California as a toddler.
The Austrian theatre man Max Reinhardt discovered the 19-year-old in the role of Hermia of Shakespeare's "MidernNight's Dream".
The film signed Warner Brothers signed her for seven years and brought her big alongside Eroll Flynn.
She made eight eight films with the heartbreaker.
In 1946 she won her first Oscar in the lead role of "To Each His Own".
The film was released in Germany under the title "Mutterherz".
Three years later, the award for Best Actress in William Wyler's "The Heiress".
She was also much recognized as a neurotic eccentric in "The Dark Mirror" and "The Snake it".
Daphne du Maurier proposed her in 1952 for the lead role in the film adaptation of her novel "My Cousin Rachel".
It became a worldwide success.
With her with her long-Bette Davis she played in "Wiegenlied für eine Leiche".
His marriage to the writer Marcus Goodrich (1946 to 1953) 1946 his son Benjamin.
In Paris, de Havilland married journalist Pierre Paul Galante and had his daughter Gisèle with him.
This marriage broke.
Rumors of an affair with former British Prime Minister Edward Heath were never confirmed.
"Road to Timmendorf": Beach volleyball: Thole / winder miss the final at Comeback
World Cup II Julius Thole and Clemens Wickler missed the final at the beach volleyball tournament "Road to Timmendorf".
At the meeting of the top teams in Düsseldorf, they defeated in the semifinals to their national team colleagues Nils Ehlers and Lars Flüggen with 1: 2 (17: 21, 21: 17, 19: 21).
Most recently, Thole / winicklplayed at the World Tour Final in Rome in September last year.
In the final on the Rhine, their conquerers Ehlers / Flüggen won a defeat against the surprise team Lukas Pfretschner and his interim partner Steven van de Velde with 0: 2 (17: 21, 17: 21).
In addition to the show tournament, three starting places for the German championships were played in TimmendorSeptember in Timmendorfer Strand: The tickets were secured by Armin Dollinger / Simon Kulzer, Manuel Harms / Richard Peemüller and Simon Pfretschner / Milan Sievers.
Calbitz ejection from AfD confirmed - FDP speaks of "fig leaf"
From the excluof Andreas KalFDP, the the ulsion Andreas Andreas Kalbitz from AfAfD is only a fig fig leaf "and does not change the character of the party.
"The AfD is the parliamentary arm of the right-wing extremists in Germany.
Andreas Kalbitz is only part of the tip of the iceberg of the radicals in the AfD, "said the FDP interior politician Benjamin Strasser of the news agency dpa in Berlin.
The Saturday Arbitration Court of the AfD had confirmed the excluulof Kalof several several several Stuttgart Stuttgart Stuttgart sion of Kalb,, which the Federal Executive Board had decided had majority in May.
Kalbitz is chairman of the AfD parliamentary faction in the Brandenburger Landtag.
"If the AfD really really about removing consistently removing right-wing extremists from their party, functionaries like Björn Höcke cke his followers would have have been been ruled elled," said Strasser.
"However, there is no political will for this in the AfD, because right-wing extremism now part of the party."
CSU General Markus Blume said said simil:: "The fact that Andreas KalKalitz itz now excluded says nothing nothing and change change," he told the "World on Sunday".
"Rather, there are volumes of how many frensupsupporters a right-wing extremist still has in the middle of the AfD."
Blume assumes that the AfD will land below below five percent in elections in the future.
"The days of the AfD in the parliaments are numbered".
Kalbitz was one of the spokesmen of the officially dissolved solved "wing" around the Thuringian AfD D and group chairman BjörörHöHö; the the VerfassungsProtection classifies the monint as as "secured right-wing extremist aspiration".
In May, the AfD federal board had thrown Kalbitz out of the party.
As reason reason he stated stated Kalbitz itz not stated an membership membership membership in the now in the now now "" "loy"" Heimat" (HDHD) and HDthe Republicans when he his party.
Kalbitz denies membership in the HDJ.
The chairman of the left group in the Brandenburg Landtag, Sebastian Walter, also stressed that the decision of the Federal Arbitration ration did not change the character of the AfD: "The wolwolhas eaten only chalk.
The AfD remains a far-right party, whether with or without calbitz ".
This decision would weakens the federal party nor the right wing.
"The manoeuvre of the Meuthen troupe is transparent.
One wants to escape further observation by the Verfassungsschutz and try to get through under the radar, "said Walter.
"The AfD will not get rid of the spirits she called.
A expulection does not change, "commented Brandenburg SPD SPD General EriEriStohn ohn on the decision in the Kalbitz case.
"Here the AfD state association and the faction still held their right-wing leader."
The legal dispute over Kalbitz's membership in the AfD will continue.
He announced on Saturday that he would take take action against the decision of the Federal Arbration Court.
North Sea wind farms deliver 21 percent more electricity
The wind power plants on the German North Sea fed 11.51 terawatt hours electricity electricity into the grid in the first six months of the year.
This is a good 21 percent more than in the same period of the previous year, said the operator TenTennet in Bayreuth.
Tennet is responsible for the transfer of the North Sea electricity to the mainland and the forwarding by the German electricity grid.
The wind turbines on the Baltic Sea, which do not part to Tennet net network area, have fed another 2.22 terawatt hours (TWh) of electricity.
Overall, wind wind from from North North and Baltic Baltic Sea to 13.73 TWh, compared to a good 11.64 TWh in the first half of 2019.
The wind harvest at sea thus accounts for almost 19 percent of the total wind current in Germany; which is about four percentage points more than a year ago.
New wind farms ensure higher generation capacities
In addition to the wind conditions, the increased increased contribution offoffwind energy is ises from higher generation capacities, because new wind farms have gone to the grid in the past twelve months.
If the 1270 wind power plants in the North Sea were all to at full at at the same time, they could generate 6.7 gigawatts of electricity.
The transmission capacity is sufficient for this; according to Tennet, it is 7.1 gigawatnet.
By 2030, it is expected to rise to 17 gigawatts in the German North Sea.
"In Germany and the Netherlands, we have investing 20 billion euros in the expansion of offshore network connections," said Tennet Managing Director Tim Meyerjürgens.
In reality, wind farms cannot exploit their capacity at sea, but reach about 40 percent.
The previous record day this year is 2 January, when the North Sea wind farms generated more than six gigawatts of electricity.
On average, the North Sea wind turbines produce about 2.5 to 3.0 gigawatts of electricity, which corresponds to three to four nuclear power plants.
As a result, almost seven million households could be supplied with electricity.
Art "Skirmish" - an exhibition by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold in the gallery of the Gmünder Kunstverein.
This was almost a small anniversary celebration for the 130.
Birthmünof the Kunstmünder Kunstverein: The exhibition opening "Skirmish" with works by the Leipzig Christian Christian Bold bleup up the usual setting after the Corona break.
Much more art lovers than usual pursued the dialogue between the artist and the chairman of the Kunstverein, Professor Dr. Klaus Ripper.
The musical equivalent was provided by the band "Defenders of the Universe" on the southern Kornhausplatz.
North of the gallery, the association "Sandtogether" was engaged.
Freital: Windberg Festival cancelled due of Corona
The Windberg festival does not take place this year.
The city of Freital has cancelled the three-day festival planned in September.
In other years, more than 30,000 people had attended this city festival.
"We truly did not make this decision easy and hophopuntil last last minute minute for the difficult difficult difficult it is for the last involved," explained Mayor Uwe Rumberg (partiparty).
"But in the end, as as organizers, we are responsible for the health of many thousands of people."
If tens of thousands had fto the the grounds and the marquee, minimum distances, hygiene regulations and contact tracking accordance could not current current Coronaschthe current could not have been observed.
Or the restrictions would have been so strong that there would have have much left of a folk festival.
In addition, the ational ational and monitoring effort would increase disproportionately many times over.
Rumberg comforted next year.
Then the city of Freital tal celebrating its 100th anniversary, among things, with the WinterbergFestival from 7 to 9 May 2021 and the Day of the Saxons from 10 to 12 September 2021.
Dressage Olympic champion Werth in Achleiten not to beat
Achleiten - Six x-Olympic champion Isabell Werth was the outstanding rider at the dressage tournament in Achleiten, Austria.
The 51-year-old from Rheinberg won four wins at four starts at the weekend.
After she had won a Grand Prix at the start with Weihegold and Quantaz, she was also unbebe beat on Sunday in the Grand Prix Special and in the freestyle.
On the 15-year-old mare Weihegold, Werth clearly ailailed against the Austrian the Austria against TheAustrian Victoria Max-TheAustria on AbeggSunday.
In the freestyle, too, the Germans were clearly clearly on Quantaclearly in front of their 4-4-year-old student Victoria Max-Theurer.
Werth's winning horse Quantaz belongs to Max-Theurer.
The most successful dressage rider in the world is intended to establish the ten-year-old stallion in the Grand Prix.
For Quantaz, it was the first freestyle ever.
Werth won won all Achfour four at the first tournament in Achleiten three weeks ago.
The last of the three international tournaments is planned for 14 to 16 August.
More air traffic controllers in Worms in the future
Worms ms University continues into the air: "DFDFDeutsche FlugFlugsicherung" creates a professorship for "Air Traffic Management".
A corresponding contract between the university and the DFS has now been signed in Worms.
The contract was signed for three years and starts in 2021.
With the professorship, it is possible to enable the start of study not only in in summer, but also in the winter semester.
This means that twice as many students can be trained as before.
At the same time, the capacities are both the university and at the university and at Air DFAcademy Academy are utiliutilized.
DFS will advise the university on the establishment and appointment of the professorship.
Represented at the university since 2019
Since the summer semester 2019, the first students have been in the Air Traffic Management course as part of their training as an air traffic controller at Worms University of Applied Sciences.
Nine students nine students started this year.
So far, the experience of DFS has been very positive and the achievements of the students are outstanding.
The combination of study and pilot training contributes significantly to further increasing the attractiveness of the pilot profession.
"In these times, funding is not economically easy economically us.
However, we firmly expect air traffic to recover recover and grow again in the long term.
In order to be able to fulfil our legal mandmandin the future, we need highly qualified personnel, "says Professor Klaus-Dieter Scheurle,, Managing Director of DFS at the signing of the contract.
"For DFS, the endowed professorship is a future-proof investment that will provide air traffic controllers with broad broad, interdisciplinary knowledge base in the long term.
We therefore continue the good cooperation with the university and at the same time underpin our attractiveness as an employer. "
This is also underlined by Professor Dr. Jens Hermsdorf, President of Worms University University of Applied Sciences: "The endowed professorship forms an important bridge between science and business.
With it, we would like to build on the existing cooperation with DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung as a practical partner for the dual bachelor degree programme in Air Traffic Management. "
For Worms ms ms Applied Applied Sciences, the of German German traffic control is is both motivation and commitment to further expand their teaching and research research in the future fields of air aviation.
In its to the air traffic controllers of tomorrow, the university could set very special highlights innovative innovative innovative for its students with first endowed endprofessorship for a dual of programme.
Dr. Denis Alt, State Secretary at the Ministry of Science, Continuing Education and Culture, emphasises: "Worms focus in aviation transport transport, ms University Worms ms has a selling selling position in Rhineland-Palatinate.
Today's signing of the cooperation agreement strengthens the university's profile. "
Rescue screwdriver lands on the A 45
The 30 minutes motorway was 45 closed for 30 minutes on Saturday afternoon in schaffenburg enburg Aschaffenburg, as the rescue helicopter was in operation after a traffic accident.
A 76-year-old drove straight with a Ford at 12.40 40 at the AlAlau-au-exit in au-corner and landed on the guardrail.
Due to the impact, the fronttabags bags triggered, the driver suffered minor injuries on the face and had to be taken to a hospital for treatment.
The injuries of the 72-year-old passenger passenger were cared for by the emergency doctor and the patient was then flown to a hospital with the rescue helicopter.
At present, however, the police assume assume that there is no risk of life.
The damaged vehicle, in which a damage of about 2000 euros was,, had to be towed off.
Heil wants to examine other industries by meat industry
The Corona crisis reto the conditions in parts of the meat industry.
Strengtening of the law is imminent.
But are they right - and will so?
Federal Labour Minister Hubertus Heil (SPD) also wants to check other industries according to the planned strict regulations against grievances in the meat industry.
"We will look at industry industry industry then then appropriate appropriate for the respective industry if necessary," said Heil told the German Press Agency in Berlin.
Germany's employers already warwarning against restricting factory contracts in general.
After the mass Corona eruption at the meat giant Tönnies in North Rhine-Westphalia, the Federal Cabinet wants to pass a law of Heil this Wednesday.
Large slaughterters should no longer allowed to to loy external personnel for slaughter, dismantling and meat processing.
To this end, the use of factory contract and temporary workers is to be banned there.
Employer president Ingo Kramer told the pa pa: "ers away from general general restriction of contracts contracts and employment, if you don not want to completely le le the economy".
For contracts are, example, the the basis basis their their value added the customer for wide areas areas of fts, the construction industry and plant construction.
"The misgressions of individuals cannot destroy such an important instrument..
Heil assured: "My goal is not to ban work contracts throughout the German economy."
Work contracts make sense.
"When an industrial company orders a craftsman to install a safety system, this is a normal factory contract."
The German meat industry considers a ban on work contracts and temporary work unconstitutional in its industry alone.
It is not the able why the porlaw should be packaging er should should porpor) in in future future be sausage, says a statement statement the the project, as the the "Neue snsnabrücker Zeitung" (Saturday reports.
A ban would therefore increase the consumer price by 10 to 20 percent per kilo and product.
In many cases Eastern European European from factory contraccontracworked in the industry hours hours hours day day according to the of of an examination of the NRW occuphealth and 16 administration.
They often had no break.
Wages was withtained for protective equipment or rent.
It was also stated that the situation in the accommodation of workers was often miserable.
Heil said that a relatively sharp law had already into into force for the meat industry in 2017.
However, they were bbassed by "tricky constructions".
"Now must be clean up".
The politician announced: "In the Occupational health and Act Act, which we to to decide the the cabinet at the end of July, are also measures that not only affect the meat industry - for example, higher test rates in occupational safety or clear criteria for Community accommodation".
The draft presented the dpa pa amendments to the Act on the uring of Workers' Rights in the MeMeIndustry and the Occupational Safety and Safety Act.
Brandenburg's Consumer Protection Minister Ursula Nonnemacher (Grünens) considers more intensive controls necessary.
"I would like us to be able to make even more controls in many supervisory areas: food controls, animal welfare, possible, for example as animal transport," said Nonnemacher on Sunday in the RB programme "Brandenburg aktuell".
But more controls also require more HR positions.
Three dead ultrultralight crash in Germany
According to the police, three people died an an an ultrultrultright aircraft aircraft an an apartment in WesWesWesin the state state RhinRhinRhine-Westphalia.
One child was injured.
Two other people were rescued injured in the accident, said a spokesman for the district el center Wesel.
According to the police, a parachute ute ute found at the site of the accident.
The "Rheinische Post" reported on eyewitnesses nesses the plane had colded with a hot air balloon before ballocrash.
The house was a single or two-family house.
No details were unknown.
Eiction of Frankfurter Opernplatz is peaceful
A week after the riots in Frankfurt, the evacuation of the opera Square also peaceful peaceful Sunday night to Sunday.
Finally,, a dozen people were on the square, but left left at the 1'the before the start of the'few.
The police had been deployed with numerous officers since the evening evening, and a police police police could be seen throughout the city.
For the first time this weekend, from midnight there was ban ban ban for the opera platz, where riririplace a week ago.
Policemen had been attacked with bottles out of the crowd of celebrations.
At least five officers were injured after police police, several police vehicles were damaged.
The night of Saturday had also remained calm.
Car striover over: Young woman seriously injured in an accident on Bundesstraße 83 at Hofgeismar
In an accident between Schöneberg and Hümme, a 21-year-old suffered serious injuries on Sunday at around: 25 p.m.
She was taken to the Klinikum Kassel.
With thermal imaging cameras, the fire brigade was looking for possible passengers.
According to the police, the woman was on Bundesstraße 83 83 her location of HüHüm, when her car car car from the road from previously unexplained cause and fell over several times.
In order to save the accident, the fire brigade had to cut off the roof of the car.
Since it was unclear whether there was still someone in the vehicle, the adjacent corn field was searched by the rotary ladder with a thermal imaging camera.
The drone squadfrom Warburg, which also works with thermal imaging cameras, had also been ordered for search search.
However, the volunteers found find anyone between the high corn plants.
The seriously injured was taken to the Kassel bulance to the Kassel bulance for further ance.
Almost 50 volunteers of the fire brigade Hofgeismar, Schöneme and Schöneberg were on site.
The highway was closed for two hours due to the accident.
Juventus Champion in Italy
Turin - After a redemping goal from Cristiano Ronaldo, record champion Juventus has secured the Italian championship for the ninth time ninth row.
The team around the five-time world football player the total 3636Scudetto of the club's perfect with a 2: 0 (1: 0) on Sunday evening in the home match against Sampdoria Genoa.
Ronaldo scored for 1 – 0 before the time.
With 83 points, Turin, who competed without the last injured injured injured player Sami hehedira, is not be be from from place place two days before the end of the season of Serie season.
The table reach Inter Milan is seven points behind.
Juventus was harmless despite the first peridespite in the first half, then Ronaldo met the last action after a free kick variant.
The 35-year-old used a a of Miralem Pjanic from the penalty penalty line directly with a flat shot (45 th + 7).
Ronthe do was also guests guests Ronaldo was also involved in 2: 0, after his shot FederFederBernardardesch( (th)) his).
This ensured the lackamless but decisive success.
The fouloul meter shot to the bar bar the 89th minute minute have have only RonRonaldo do with a view to the scjee rating.
"It is complicated to stay mentally and physically at ball level for 90 minutes.
The games are strange, and the entum is changing very slightly, "coach MauriMaurizio ri ri after the 1: 2 at Udinese Calcio on Thursday.
Especially the mental exhaustion of his players is great, said the Juve coach.
Due of the defeat, the Turin had not yet been able to make the championship perfect.
Juve end, the the caluring uring at the the of the the due to the weakness of the competitors.
In the eleven games before the match on Sunday, the Sarriteam team had only only five victories.
Whether Ronaldo also becomes top scorer is questionable.
While the Portuguese superstar has scored 31 goals so far, the former CirCiro Immobile has already 34 34 on his account his his pack pack pack pack pack 5 1 1 1 1))) zio zio zio zio zio zio zio at the HellHellVerona Verona as many as Robert Lewandowski contributed to the title title of FC Bayern.
The record in Italy is held by the current juve professional Gonzalo Higuaín.
The Argentine scored 36 goals for the SSC Naples in the 2015 – 2016 season.
In August, the next chance of awawaiting for the "Old Lady" of Italian football.
Juventus is in the round of 16 of the Champions League, but has to make for a 0 0 0 on on against OlympiOlympiLyon on 7 Lyon to reach the final tournament in Lisbon.
In the next knockout round, Real Madrid or Manchester City would wait as an opponents.
Baden-Württemberg: More than 250 illegal car races recorded
Stuttgart - Despite all threatened punishments and court rul,, ists ists continue to accelerate on countless illegal races on countless illegal races: Last year and the first four months of this year, the police in the southwest have already registered more than 250 illegal car races.
Although there are comparcomparative for the years earlier, but the the vers are are increasingly work work judicial judicial judicial authorities: 2018 total total total 1515investigations investigations conducted conducted were in a prosecprosecors ors ors ors Constance Mannheim Mannheim in 2018, a year later it were already 252 and in the current year until the beginning June June already 151.
The races were less about organized events, as can be seen from the reply of the Ministry of the Interior to request request from LandLandtag PD.
In most cases, the drivers had spontaneously eted against each other or they had fled from the police - this is also reported as an illegal race.
German men between the age of 18 and 60 were aged at the wheel.
113 fines - 15 times imprisonment
Only in comparatively few cases are the raed caught caught and also asked to pay:: to to the Ministry of Interior Interior, a total of finfinfinhave been imposed since 2018 and 15 sentences sentences sentences pronounced.
However, there is no evidence that the number of illegal car races actually increasing.
Rather, other drivers ists acted more sensithan than because to the tratragic accidents and processes of past years, indicated more more, said a spokesfor minister said.
The highway 8 is particularly popular with with. 8. and repeatedly slow brake traffic there to make space and use the free track for a race.
Last August, a dozen drivers were caught near Kirchheim under Teck, three months earlier there were even 18 drivers on the A8 at Merklingen.
A81 is most popular "race track"
On the A81, the police register even more races than on any other federal highway.
A speed limit is to to slow down the the vers on on the particularly section section between rowand and Geisinging.
The mostly high-priced and pued ed sports sports luxury cars often have Swiss plates plates, because the drivers to to lawn wn Germany Germany because the the penpenalties for too fast driving and car racing in neighboring country.
For the SPD, the speed limit must not be reduced to a few routes: "With a speed speed of 130 kilometers kilometers hour hour, we would ackle this problem on motorways," says Martin Rivoir, the transport expert of the SPD parliament group.
"The inhibition threshold for for awould would be significantly higher if you should not be on the road road here and there with 200 kilometers of hour and more."
Rivoir thinless of enlighlighment ment or campaigns:: Anyone who disdisall rules rules such such way and not not only only own own own,, but also the the of road road users, is hardly hardly accessible with reason ".
ADAC calls for stronger police cradown
On the other hand, this is enough enough ADAD:: "We expect that Rasers cannot be deterred by the speed mits," says Holger Bach, Head of Transport and Environment at ADAC Württemberg.
It calls for additional and harder controls on the routes routes.
It infrequently, the the of of of becomes painpainpainand ous ous ousness ousness January January 2019 2019 April 2020 2020 three three died died died the races races,, two two uninvolved involved in a nightly crash in Stuttgart's city center and one in Gerlingen.
In November, two young men are said to to have a race car race race.
One of the vehicles came off the road, hit ashed a garden wall and remained on the side, the 18-year-old passenger died.
21 other people have been injured in the races of the past two years.
However, according of Interior Minister Thomas StStrob,,, stricstricpenpenpennot not: "" "need action action action action sancillegal illegal vehicle vehicle harharis is seen seen," says the paper of the Ministry of the Interior.
Blue light of July 23: Thirsty burlarar steals drinks from snack
Rohrdorf: A man broke into a snack on Thursday in Rohrdorf (w Calw Thursday and stole drinks and cash.
A witness heard sounds in Talstraße at 3.3.40 a.m. and ran towards the snack.
There he noticed a man who used the fridge with drinks and then left the snack ack a previously inserted entrance door.
The perpetrator fled towards the meadows behind the snack.
According to the police, the burgglar also used at a checkout and stole cash in the low three-digit area.
The suspect is described as follows: he is about 1.75 to 1.80 meters in size and of strong stature.
In fact, he wore a black hoodie, black trousers and bright shoes.
The police accept further evidence.
Ackermann jumps to final stage at Sibiu Tour
Cycylist list cal cal ckerckermann won his second victory of the day on the final stage of the 10th Sibiu Tour.
The 26-year-old Palatinate from the BorBorhansansgrohe prevailed on the 109 kilometometer long section with a start and finish in Herbiu in the mass sprint, after he had already won a stage on Saturday.
It were the victories of the season three and four for Ackermann.
In the overall standings, his Austrian team companate Gregor Mühlberger prevailed.
The 26-year-old had confidently decided the mountain mountain trial in the morning and thus took over the top in the class.
Only 104 drivers left to the final stage in the evening.
No less than 18 starters had fallen victim to the time limit in the mountain time trial.
"I'm really happy to start the season restart with a victory," Ackermann explained after his success on Saturday.
"The sprint was really hectic," said the 26-year-old.
300 meters before the finish he simply put on his sprint, "and it also worked perfectly".
According to the rules of the World I UCI, a Corona test was carried out for all race participants and their companions six days before the start of the race.
During the entire tour, drivers and supervisin isolated hygiene bubbles were separated from the organizational team and the media.
Vieectators at the start and finish were not admitted.
Control center gave instruction on amateur resuscitation
Düsseldorf - Tragic accident on Sunday afternoon in Düsseldorf-Garath.
In an apartment house, a child (4) was suddenly lifeless in the water while bathing.
According to the fire brigade, the emergency call received received shortly before before o'm.
"A dispdispdispdispimmediately immediately instructions instructions amamamususc,," a fifiade ade okesman to BILD.
The arriving rescue rescue took took over resresigval measures a little later.
The life-threatal child was transported to the university hospital under resuscitation.
Why it is unclear.
The police routinely started the investigation into the course of the accident.
The fibriighade okesman: "We are starting from a tragic accident in the apartment".
Nuremberg: Unapproved tuning meeting - Police intervene, 700 vehicles and around 1100 people
Hundreds of cars and temporarily over 1000 people took part in a "tuning" "the the parking of of lot store on Saturday night.
The police implemented their announcement to control control such events.
A major tuning meeting place on Saturday evening (25 July 2020) in Nuremberg Südstadt.
Several hundred vehicles were involved.
According to the Middle Frania police,, around 30 30,, an an traffic traffic an an increased of vehicles in the area of a large parking ter Straße Ingolstädter Straße.
As a result, the police carried out a large number of vehicle controls there.
Only recently, the police had announced that they would to take more action against so-called autopopers.
Illegal tuning meeting in Nuremberg: Only small part from the "scene"
The officers were among top top top good 700 vehicles and about 1,100 people,, the for the police.
However, only a small part of those present can be buted to the "autopopers" and tuning scene.
Apparently, most of the relevant scene responded the the police appeal.
On the basis of the vehicles and people on site, it should could be assumed that these were mostly onlookers.
In addition, the majority of those adheradhered the the infection protection regulations, in particular particular compliance with the minimum minimum distance wearing wearing wearing mouth nose protection.
The control measures carried out the ground were ended at 1: 00 a.m.
In total, the officials in 10 vehicles changes in 10 changes that the operating permit had expired.
Four of these vehicles had to be secured.
No car races
There were no illegal car races.
"The Central headquarters FranCentral Frania will continue to keep an eye on the happening and will to carry out increased control measures, also in connection with the advent of onlookers," it said.
The agency News5 spoke with Jürgen Schrödinger from the towing company involved: "They have all beautiful rims, we must not scratscratthem," says Schrödinger.
Special tapes would be used for this purpose.
Also because the cars are wider, the company must be careful not to any damage.
"After all, the young people should get their cars back without scathed."
Figures from the Employment agency: 900 susppiccases of abuse of short-time work
Berlin - According to its own statement, the Federal Employment (BA BA) investigsome 900 900 suspsuspof of in the short-short-short-workers allowance.
"This is extremely little for more than 880,000 companies that have have short-time work," said Daniel Terzenbach, Frankfurter Frankfurter Frankfurter Frankfurter Allgemeine,, responsible for the Allgemeine business.
When many companies suddenly applied short-short-work at the beginning of the Corona crisis, the BA had to react quickly.
Normally, the examination takes up to three weeks.
"We didn't have so much time at this hot phase.
We will take all the closer look at the final accounts.
There will certainly be some more happen.
We are not naive and have a long breath ".
Indications of abuse would often come from the affected or trade unions unions.
In addition, use BA BA analysis software to detect abuse patterns.
According to Terzenbach, the BA is preparing for a possible insolvency wave in autumn.
"Will there be significantly more insolvencies than in the previous year?
The assessments differ, but we prepare for the case of the case and already train our employees in the employment agencies to process applications for insolvency money. "
The figures are still inconspicuous, TerTerenbach enbach.
World Heritage in Potsdam: Party in solved in the disGarden
Potsdam - On Friday evening about 40 young people celebrated a party in the New Garden.
The collection was dissolved at 20.48 p.m. by the the drivers of the PrusPrussian Castaces and Gardens (SPSG), the foundation announced at PNN request.
The young people then left the park.
On Saturday evening, some young people would have played rugby in the New Garden.
The meadow was cleared by district drivers, SPSPSG spokesman Frank Kallensee on Sunday.
Again and again there are illegal celebrations in the parks
In the parks of parks, there are are accumulations in in the the and hygiene hygiene regulations 9 9 9 9 inance ance are not complied with.
At the end of June there was a a with about 300 300 in the Babelsberg Park, a week later about 150 people celebrated in the New Garden.
Even without a coron arrangement, the parks are closed at nightfall.
According on the meadows is prohibited according methe is regulations, there are few exceptions.
For a long time, the foundation has been complaining that visitors would leave more and more garbage and destroy protected biotopes.
Meanwhile Berlin, illegal park parties have reached a different dimension.
In the Hasenheide in the district of Neukölln, 5,000 people celebrated an illegal techno party the night to Sunday.
The event was dissolved by the police.
Austria: Mass tests after Corona outbreak in tourist resort
With hundreds of tests, authorities have responded to a Corona outbreak in the popular Upper Austrian tourist town of St. Wolfgang.
The number of confirmed confirmed rose to 48, as according by the state authorities in Linz.
More than 100 results were still pending in the evening.
Accordingly, many of the infected young interns are in tourism companies, but at least one holiday guest has been positested.
Residents, guests and tourism staff were asked to stay in their accommodation on Saturday evening.
The curfew was set at 11 o'clock.
"There are cancellations and ellellations there and there" of bookings, said the head of the Wolfgangsee gangsee, Hans Wieser, the dpa.
Some guests also left prematurely.
St. Wolfgang is the most important tourist resort in Upper Austria, with more than 400,000 overnight stays last year.
In a normal season, about a third of the guests are Germans.
On Friday, the first infections had become publicly known.
The head of the district authority, Alois Lanz, defended on Saturday the behavior of s interns, who had celebrated in several restaurants and might have been infected there.
"We all liked to do this in our youth," he told the radio station Ö1.
However, two bars were closed on Friday to prevent further infections.
The Tourist Board launched an information campaign to raise young awareness of the dangers of Covid-19.
From Saturday, hundreds of employees, holidaymakers and locals were tested.
In addition, all guests who were in St. Wolfgang from 15 Wolfgang were contacted.
The eruption evokes memories of the Austrian ski and party resort of Ischgl in Tyrol, which was a center of the Corona spread throughout Europe in the initial phase of the pandemic.
In Austria, more than 1,500 people are currently infected with the virus.
The new infections focus on Vienna and Upper Austria.
Premier League: Man United and Chelsea qualified for Champions League
London (dpa) - English football record champion Manchester United returns to the Champions League after a year of absence.
The Red Devils secured third Premier on the the Devday of Premier Premier League a a 0 0 0 0 0) 0 against direct competitor Leicester City.
The foxes must now settle with the Europa League because Chelsea passed passed and also qualified for the premier class.
In the fight against the desation, Aston Villa was allowed to cheer.
Manchester United took into the lead by a penalty kick by Bruno Fernandes (71st minute).
After a red card for Leicester City in the extra season, Jesse met Lingard (90. + 8) to the final score.
Chelsea, Bayern of Champions Champions Champions Champions League round, defeated WolWolWolverampton – – verververampton ampton Wanderthanks to Mason ason ason Mount ()) Olivier vier vier rourou( (th + 4).
"This means a lot to me," said coach Frank Lampard, who is also ArsenArsenCup final FA FA final in in his season season as Chelsea coach.
Cheltenham Hotspur also verampton ited benefited tenham ham Wolspur ampton, who passed the WolWolves with a ager 1 1 1 1 0) at Crystal Crystal Palace and finished sixth in the Europa League.
Aston Villa won the Fernduel with Watford ford Aournournournouth outh, but had to tremtremfor class West for a Hat West Hlong United.
The late leadership of Jack Grealish (84th) immediately compensated Andrey Yarmolenko (85th).
The 1 – 1 (0: 0) was enough because Watford lost 2 – 3 (1: 3) at Arsenal.
The club, which hred three coaches in the season, relrelegated after five years of the years.
Just like Bournemouth, who could not save himself by a 3 – 1 (2 – 1) at Everton.
In the end, a point was missing.
Liverpool, which has been been English English champion since the end of June secured secured a record record with a – 1 (1 – 1) victory at Newcastle United.
99 counters are the highest that the Reds have ever achieved in a football season.
Coach Jürgen Klopp and his team narrowrowly missed the point record in English football.
Manchester City holds its record with 100 points in the 2017 – 18 season.
After the Newcast lead in the first minute, Virgil van Dijk (38th), Divock Origi (59th) and Sadio Mané (89th) played the game for Liverpool on Sunday.
"It was an extraordinary season for this extraordinary club," said scorer van Dijk after the game, "that should encourage us to defend the title.
It gets hard. "
In the end, the Premier League bosses ses also satisfied in be satisfied.
Due to the Coronavirus crisis, football in England was interrupted from 13 March to 17 June.
In the meantime, even prepredemolition or an or of the of the remaining games neutral neutral ground neutral discussed.
After all, however, the season could be played without special events - but as in Germany without spectators in the stadiums.
Arrests and violence in demonstrations against Netanyahu
The protests in Israel against Prime Minister Netanyahus are becoming increasingly violent.
Violnight clashes at night.
On the night of Sunday in, the Israeli Israeli police violviolbly bly against against in a demonstration demonstration right-right-right-anyservative u yyamin Netanyahu.
Twelve man were arrested for participating in riots, police spokesokesman Micky Rosenfeld.
Among other things, the police used water cannons to dissolve the rally.
According to media reports, around 6,000 people gathered near Netanyahu u ahoffice on Saturday evening.
They protested unemployment unemployment corruption corruption and Netanyahu's handling with the Corona crisis.
The protesters beat drums, blew into horns and called on Netanyahu to resign.
Participants in a counter-demonstration who supported Netanyahu were also arrested, the the news reported "ynet".
People also demonstrated in many many places in Israel, including in front of the head of government's private villa in the coastal town of Caesarea and in a park in Tel Aviv.
According to police police, a man was arrested near Tel Aviv because there is suspected of of spraying pepper spray on protdriving car the roadside from a moving car.
Another man was arrested after a stabbing attack on a demonstrator in the south of the country.
The protator was slightly injured in the neck.
In Jerusalem and Tel Aviv there have against Nettimes demonstrations against Netanyahu.
The rallies accompany the corruption process against the head of government.
Most recently, Netanyahu was also criticized for its handling of the Corona crisis.
Among other things, he is, prepreosrelaxation and a lack of preparation for a second corona wave.
The Corona crisis has increased hard on the country's economy.
The unemployment rate was more than 20 percent.
The number of new infections with the coronavirus in Israel has recently en to ever new record levels.
Accident at Ahlen (NRW) - Transporter crashes auf car - nine injured - Ruhr gebiet - Bild.de
Ahlen - A rear-ar-collision on nine light injuries on the afternoon at the Ahlen near Ahlen.
A motorist was with her two children (3, 5) towards Beckum.
The police: "She had suddenly slowed down because she wanted to turn."
The driver of a Mercedes transporter behind her must have seen this too late.
He crashed back on the car.
In the accident, three occupants in the car and six in the transporter were slightly injured.
Several ambulances took her to an surrounding hospital.
North Korea locks border town after Corona susppicion
North Korea has so far has seen own measures to defend defend the Coravavirus a "luminous success".
Now, for the first time, country country is reporting a sussuspicion.
Due to a first official Corona susppicion in the country, North Korea has completely aled aled a big city for fear of disaster.
Despite the strictest epidemiological defensive measures over the past six months, the malignant virus may have been introduced into the country, "the state media reported.
The state of emergency was imposed for the region around the border town of Kaesong.
The communist leadership proclaimed the highest level of the alarm.
Should the susppicis confirmed confirmed it would be the first official infection case with Sars-CoV-2 in the isolated country.
North Korea had not yet registered a single infection and described its defensive as a "luminous success".
The information was doubted abroad.
The symptoms were reportedly found in an "outlier" that illegally crossed the military demarcation line between South and North Korea on 19 19.
The person set ed to South Korea three years ago and had now returned across the border.
There was initially no confirmation South South Korea for the crossing crossing within within four four re wide and largely mined from South Korea.
However, reports by the national national agency agency onp p p South Korea Korea's military admitted the possibility of an illegal border crossing to North Korea as high.
Some of some people.
North Korea claimed, an an meeting of the the the to o o Labour Labour Party chby by by Kim Kim Kim ong ong n n n of the suspicion.
The "dangerous situation in Kaesong could trigger a deadly and destructive catastrophe."
Kim had already ordered on Friday Friday a a ventive ventive measure measure completely completely completely Kaesong and isolate each district and and region from from, "it continued.
The affected concerned and all people in Kaesong who had contact contact with her were quarantined.
The central military commission of the party therefore investigate investigate the "outout"" and the behavior of the responsible responsible unit and, if necessary, impose harsh punishment.
It is estimated, about 300,000 people live in Kaesong.
Tenitement before Council meeting: City-East and noise protection protection still under discussion before a great summer break
"In addition to environmental issues, the committee members will also vote on the development development for the major project InnenstenstttOst Ost,," says more casin in the central section of the press press release on the municipal municipal meeting meeting on,, 28, at at 30 30 p.m. in the Great Hall of the Congress Centre Pforzheim.
However, the appreciation of the eastern city is controversial until the end.
The majorities for this are scarce, most in individual committees committees depending on the presence.
Project opponent Reinhard Klein Klein critician appeal appeal from ((construction construction real,, and and IT IT IT the the the the the the the enand and then administration administration and and failed failed fail fail after ten ten years preparation preparation, as "extra-parliamentary opposition opposition," "suspecting", "speculation", "denig"" "deliberate false statements".
"Everyone thinks know better better," says Klein Klein, has been a member of municipal council council for a year as the only representative of the Pzlist list for' list.
In fact, after reading the Treaties, he is in this position: "I know what I am talking about."
The exit is cheaper cheaper cheaper cheaper cheaper the Technical hall hall hall contrary to to the the 8.5 5,,,,, the the the administration dies dies whose, for 8.5 million euros.
The city will develop quite differently than one predicpredicin the town hall and by the ponates from the economy.
To design the city by its own power and not an investor: this is his plan B. One day after Klein, the FDP / FW / UB / LED fraction, which also rejects the project, presented an alternative concept.
It essentially envisfor the renovation of the the Technical hall, the the closure closure of the castle,, the rental of the the for for administrative administrative and a small-scale inner interior interior design ideal with local carriers.
Environmental issues play central role
In addition, environmental issues will play a central role.
Among other things, the municipal Council will vote on the noise action plan.
This includes various measures to protect the population of zforzfrom from noise pollution caused by road traffic, including including reductions.
In a press release, the local transport club Germany welcomes the widespread introduction of Tempo 30. However, political political leaders in the city are not innocent cent cent fact fact that this must come this,,, nenenenetraffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic to the VV, nenenenenethe traffic traffic traffic traffic traffic and thus to traffic, little to the VCD.
The municipal council also coordinates on the participation of the city of the energy and climate protection agency Pforzheim / Enzkreis.
In addition, the agenda includes accession to the the protection Pact of the state of Baden-Württemberg, the reof of ental ental ental in in urban daydaycare and and the application for admission in the federal smart city funding.
Citizens are welcome, but must consider Corona protection measures.
Tim Zimmermann starts the new season with a lot of delay
With almost half a year of delay, Tim Zimmermann will start his premiere season at the ADAC GT Masters on GT delay.
Before the league of supercars can start regular operations, the first test drives were started.
For Zimmermann, the was was about getting to know his Lamborghini Huracan GT3 better.
The Corona crisis has long prevented Tim Zimmermann from embarkling his first first trip in the new Lamborghini Hurghan ini Grasser Racing.
This was now possible under special hygiene conditions.
The 23-year-old Langenargener made his first laps on the Lausitzring and was able to get used to his premiere in the GT3 car.
"There are already a few things that are different from the Porsche from the preseason," says Zimmermann.
"With the ABS, for example, you have to go differently in the curves.
But it really really a lot of fun. "
Zimmermann also had fun with Steijn Schothorst, with whom he will share his orange sports car in the GT Masters.
Despite his only 25 years, the chchman has been experienced in GT sport and was able to help his new teammmate in many things.
"I'm not a beginner in motorsport, but every new series also brings new challenges," says Zimmermann.
"Steijn and I understand each blinzzling and we also made enormous progress progress the session itzring from Lausitzring."
Right there - at the Lausitzring - the GT Masters will also run its first race.
From 31 July, the 33 supercars will race through Lusatia.
Zimmermann, who is one of 15 newnewcomers, knows the track.
In 2015 he was a guest at the Motodrom.
"It worked quickly and I had to get used used to the track," says Zimmermann, who starts for the Friedrichshafen racing community Graf Zeppelin.
"The Lausitzring has many fast passages that you have to hit optimally to be fast".
How fast Zimmermann really really turns turns out in two weeks.
"Of course, the teams popoker a bit in the tests," he says.
"Finally, we are very satisfied and look forward to the first weekend at Lausitzring..
The race in Brandenburg will be the prelude of a densely crowded calendar.
Seven races seven races until the beginning early November.
Current state is that no spectators will be admitted - but there is a prominent guest.
In mid-August at the Nürburgring, berg Formula 1 driver Niko Hülkenberg will take into NürGT grwheel.
British Transport Minister caught from quarantine decision
According to press press, the decision decision the British government to quarantantantweeks weeks makers makers weeks weeks weeks weeks weeks return, has caught country country country of minister colcold.
Accto ingly, Grant Shapps is currently on holiday in Spain, while his colleagues decided the measure at home on Saturday.
Due to the increasing onfigures figures numbers in Spain, the CabCabin London the the country from the list of countries countries from which entry enter enter without quarantine requirements.
The new regulation will apply from today, Sunday Sunday so so Shapps apps also have to to quarantine after his ine.
In Austria, the government has also imposed quarantine measures for returnees.
But the regulation applies to those who are just holiday on the deadline, only from Saturday, August August, and was not introduced overnight.
Inthe way, Spain is so far one of one "" countries "countries Austria for which no quarquarine is ine in Austria.
"Numerous ministers may have known in advance that there is possibility possibility that quarantine ine be imposed imposed on holimakers on Spain, commented commented MEP Diane Abbot.
"But obviously nobody boboed to Grant Grant Shapps."
Almost a month after the end of the Corona emergency in Spain and the the iry of the strict curcur, the number of in the country are rise again.
Virologists blresponsible the nightlife for the new spread.
Spain is one of the favourite holiday countries of the British.
The British government is currently advising ing travel travel travel to mainmainland,, Canary Canary Islands Islands Islands Islands Islands Islands Islands popular British British holidayBritish are exempexcluded.
To date, more than 272,000 infections with the novel coronavirand and more than 28,000 deaths have been registered in Spain.
Russia: Navy Day: Putin announces hyperpersonic weapons for warships
Russian President Vladimir Putin announced announced the navnavnavnavcountry country warwarwarships with modern weapons in al weapons.
With these weapons weapons in the world, the the possibilities of the Russian navnaval navbe expanded, Putin Putin on Sunday in St. St. at the central naval parade.
According to the agency Interfax, the Ministry of Defense also informed about successful tests of the zirconic ic ic ic sile built for the Navy.
The hyperpersonic weapons have a multiple of the speed of sound of around 343 meters per second.
They are considered weapons of the future.
Underwater tropedeo will to be built
It was also said on the atomatomatomequipped underwater torpedo Poseidon, Poseisaid.
The planned sea drone is planned for the destruction of coastal targets.
The president, who himself also sailve by a military boat, said that this year alone 40 new ships would be put into service at the individual naval of of the largest country on world.
Russia has such a large coastal area as no other country in the world.
For 300 years, the navhas has reliably ably ably, Putin Putin at the nationnationwide celebrated by by sailors.
In many other Russian coastal towns, the navnaval forces also parNavy Day with parades.
In Syria, where Russia fought alongside alongside rulBashashal-AssAss, the military demonstrated demonstrated in a gun show in the Mediterranean port of Tart's strength.
Ammunition was also fired there.
A video published by the Ministry of Defense showed not only warships, including a submarine, but also combat helicopters and jets.
Hurricane "Hanna" reaches Texas: CorcomplicCorona Corona
Washington - This first hurricane of this year's season over the Atlantic has hit ashore in Texas.
Lifethreatening ening floods strong winds winds and heavy rainfall now threatened parts of the US state, the the riririCenter of National National ririNONOAA at night (Sunday (local time).
Governor Greg Abbott declared the state of emergency for many districts.
The Corona pandemic rampampin Texas Texas the the the the helpers more difficult, Abbott continued according to the US media.
Evacuated called for caution
"Every hurricane is a tremendous challenge," said Abbott according to the Houston Chronicle.
With arding to the cyclone in Texas, he added: "challenge challenge is complicated and is exacated considering considering it it sweeping through an area that is the most affected affected the most affected by Covid-19."
According to Johns Hopkins University, around 5,000 people have died in alone alone alone as a result of the Corona pandemalone.
Abbott called for people who who had to leave their homes.
They should not disregard practices that we have used to to ", such as wearing masks, the governor said according to CBS.
It is important that everyone stopped.
Therefore, hotel rooms were also provided in some places.
In addition, it should be test in emergency shelters emergency Corona.
Damage was initially only reported from the coastal town of Port Mansfield.
Storm warning withdrawn
At wind speeds of up to 150 kilometers per hour, "Hanna" was been hit the the island Padre re Island re land just off coast Texas coast.
The tropical storm had previously been upgraded to the lowest level one hurricane.
For the coastal section from Port Mansfield to Sargent, a storm surwarning warning was issued issued and later withdrawn.
Authorities expected a weakening, while "Hanna" moved ininland and headed to northeastern Mexico.
"Douglas" is moving in Hawaii
In the Pacific, Hurricane "Douglas" headed headed Hawaii at night at Sunday at wind speeds of about 150 kilometers per hour.
However, the hurricane center expected him to to weaken.
According to the forecast tion it is said to be near the largest largest islands Hawaii on Sunday (local time) - then as a storm just below the hurricane threshold.
Above the Atlantic, NOAA expected an above-average hurhurcane cane this year after a May May May.
From June to the end of November, up to ten hurricanes were be be, of which up to six could become very strong cyclones, the agency had said.
On average, there are six hurricanes per year Atlantic the Atlantic, three of which develop into storms of storms.
In view of available climate data and the higher water temperature in the Atlantic and the Caribbean, the elelihood of normal normal season only 30 percent percent, of of abaverage average average even ten ten percent it was said at the time.
US President Donald Trump wrote on Twitter that his government closely watching the storms and was in contact with the affected concerned.
Four goals cancpped: Video assistant "punished" Sassuolo
Sassuolos Filip Djuricic were scored two goals
Naples - Four goals scored, four goals goals four goals: Sassuolo Calcio experienced a ravenblack evening at 0 0 2 (0 0:)) at SSC Naples Naples the Italian football league Serie A - and was really angry at the assistant assistant of the assistant.
"A festival of ungiven gates for Sassuolo.
The VAR has never AR so so tough against a team, "commented the" Corriere dello Sport ".
Host Naples had taken lead through a goal of defdefender Elseid Hisaj in the 8th minute, in the 32nd minute Filip Djurjuricic cheered the minute.
The Video Assistant Referee (VAR) withthe the due due to a siside position.
Five minutes later, Djuricic shot the ball again into net net - again the AR AR intervened ed.
The goals of attatters Francesco Caputo (50.) and Domenico Berardi (61st) were also drawn by the the referreferees referreference to the VAR.
In the extra time, Allan made the 2-0-final score for Naples and the bitter evening for Sassusuolo.
"For Sassuolo, the VAR is worse than a radar trap on the road and punishes Sassuolo like no team before.
The new technology provides records, "writes the" Gazzetta dello Sport ".
FC Bayern Munich: Pavard injured
Munich (dpa) - The start of the hot preparation phase for the Champions League began with a setback for double winner FC Bayern.
Hansi Flick lick, who who "" "" a a a training and and a training training days days to to after after after first first training training how he can rebuild his successful defense after the injury of world champion Benjamin Pavard.
The Frenchman, who has the third most minutes of behind behind Manuel Manuel Neuer midmidder Joshua Kimmich ich suffered suffered a injury injury on left left foot and threatens to be missing in decisive royal class duels.
In the Munich dirgling weather, the defender ender off a training game and was driven from the course with a golf kart.
How long the unregular regular has to pause in the fight for the title is open.
A match in the round round final match match ChelChelsea 8 8 August is 8 August, the 24-24-year-old hope hope for the final tournament starting in Lisbon August in August.
The Bavarians do not want to be stopped by the mishafrom from training on Sunday.
In his personal triple formula, Flick named the three attributes he wants to see from his stars on the way to Portugal's capital.
Quality, intensity and concentration ectors ectors ectors show show vic, intensity intensity ectors ectors ectors the ideally 28 28 days the the King class final on 23 August.
"We simply mastered the mandatory tasks tasks championship championship tropcup.
Now it is important to create the special thing, "said Flick.
Until the Munich the Munich can deal with the final tournament tournament and a camp camp camp the Algarve Algarve, the the round duty duty ChelChelsea FC Chelsea.
After the 3 – 0 in the first leg before the Corona break, the LondonLondoners in the home arena not not become a nightnightare are as as as in the lost "dahdaham" in 2012.
"We have to go through the door.
We want to win, create good conditions and trust with a good game, "demanded lick lick.
A test for the match match match against Friday against Marseille que Marseille.
With a long speech, Flick had sworn his stars, who had a 13 days days after after the double, on a unique August.
He welcomed 31 players on Säbener Straße, including the new players for noble purchasing Leroy Sané, who met all new colleagues colleagues the field for the first time after his move from Manchester City.
"Leroy did well like all new new," Flick lick.
But instead of talking about the new season, when Sané & Co. are no longer allowed to train, Flick lick to talk about the current title project of the German series champion.
After days of individual and small group training,, team now now now trained for for the London,,,, in to the the rock ensemble are in the game rhythm.
After that, the Munich als finface a quarfinfinals against FC Barcelona and ononMessMess,, Real the semifinals Real Madrid ventManchester City or Juventus are semi-opponents.
A way to the final in Lisbon "is not so easy," stressed the head coach, who can rely on the services of his new assistant Miroslav slav in training from Tuesday.
The World Championship Recscoroter Klose and Flick know of some joint tournament preparation, which is particularly important in the 0-to 100 tuning.
With his current team, the work is "a pleasure", pralick pralick.
The "focus on winning" is an impressive characteristic of his team.
The tournament with nine-teams was also also ambitious on Sunday.
All of the performers were were,, the the willing Thago ago defdefDavid David aba aba, wherwherabouts is not secured beyond the royal class season.
Formula 1 needs a special rule to select its world champion
Since the required number on the required number of continents, the FIA must improvise to award the World Cup titles.
All American races were cancelled.
Race calendar is becoming more and more concrete
The race calendar of the current Formula One season continues to take shape.
In addition to the ten confirmed Grand Prix to far, three more race tracks were added during the week.
In October, the Nürgrgrgrgrin in Germany and Portimão in Portuguese.
On the first of November, Lewis Hamilton and Co. will fight for World Cup points on the Italian traditional race track in Imola.
The 2020 race calendar thus includes 13 races.
"We are pleased that we continue to make great progress in the completion of our plans for the 2020 season," said Formula 1 boss Chase Carey.
A total of 15 to 18 races in the premier class class motorsport are to be completed in this extraordinary season.
Formula 1 wants to complete its season in Asia.
The final race calendar will be fixed and published in the coming weeks.
According to media reports, performances ances ances Vietnam and Malaysia Malaysia Malaysia Malaysia end end of of could the the the races races in Bahrain and Abu Dhabi in December.
Regulations calls for race on three continents
The Formula the Formula 1 require at least races on three continents for the award of the World Cup.
Even if, as currently planned, only two two continents continents, there should be a world champion.
With the help of a special rule, the FIA wants to award the titles by cof "extraordinary circumstances" because of the Coronavvirus pandemic.
The traditional start of the season in Australia in March had to be cancelled in the short term due to the the oming corona crisis.
A return to the continent this year is not an issue.
In addition, Formula 1 will not be a guest in America this year.
Cancusection ises criticism in Brazil
Due to the tense corona situation, the races will not take place in Canada, the USA, Mexico and Brazil.
"We look forward to being with them again next season," Carey ey.
The rejof the American races came with criticism especially especially in Brazil: "The rejwas not not surprising for us, but we cannot accept the reasons for this," said Tamas Rohonyi, promoter of the Grand Prix in São Paulo.
The infection figures in the São Paulo area is significantly lower than in other regions of Brazil.
The concerns of some teams about not anting to to in Brazil would not justijustify rejection.
We are prepared for the required security measures.
Greta Thunberg: Evil look against Donald Trump went around the world
Greta Thunberg talked about her meeting with US President Donald Trump.
Greta Thunberg was a guest of the Colbert's show LatenColbert via video switch and and in in an interview what she had in mind during her encounter with Donald Trump.
Climate atkivisGreGreta Thunberg was a guest in a popular US Latenight show via video switch.
Among other things, she told about her fight against the world's powerful.
The teenager also talked about her famous "evil look" during her meeting with Donald Trump.
New York City - Over the past two years, climate activist Greta Thunberg has attracted attention with her tireless commitment to the "Fridays For Future" movement.
Now she spoke in a well-known Latenight show about her plans in the future and her meeting with US President Donald Trump at the UN climate summit last summit.
Latenight presenter Stephen Colbert welcomed 17-year-old Thunberg on your show on Tuesday and conducted a longer interview with the Swewoman.
She spoke not only about her fight against climate change, but also about her conflict with the powerful of the world.
"There are some things that surprised me," she said.
"How far people go to focus away from the climate crisis," shook them.
"Everything from organized hate campaigns to threats just because a group of children take to the streets" she experienced.
Heads of state and leaders who mock ck against in social media media even even to silence silence find find "funny funny" as they show the reactions "since they have no other answer".
It became particularly interesting at the end of the interview, when Greta Thunberg was approached to a well-known scene in which she she a a President itter look behind at itter President Trump.
At the UN UN climate Summit in New York, for which the nude visor sailed across the Atlantic, her expressive view was captured by the cameras and has since been seen by countless people on the Internet.
The short clip created a GIF, an animated image that ultimately became one of the most commonly used images for Trump opponents.
But what did the 17-year-old think about the US president at that moment?
To Stephen relatively bert's relatively Stephen Colbert she she answered answered briefly dry dry "To To honest honest, I think think't need any further explanation."
The experienced satirist Colbert probably not not expected the quickact-ready answer and disappeared from laughpicture from laughpicture.
With her "How dare you?" speech on the principles of climate protection, she was remembered of many at the climate conference.
Ex-Dortmund immobile with three pack for Lazio Rome
Ciro Immobile is now the par with with's Robert Lewandowski in with Bavaria's Robert LeGolden shoe.
Former Dortmund Ciro Immobile continues has the best chance of becoming a top scorer in the Italian football Championship.
The former BVB professional scored three goals in the 5: 1 (1: 1) victory of Lazio Rome HellHellVerona Verona, including two penalty penalty in the extra seasons of both halves.
Thus, the the 30-has 34 34 season season season season the the 34 season season season season the - just just as many Robert LeLewandowski from Bayern Bayern scored in the past Bundesliga season.
In Italy Cristiano RonRondo follows with 30 goals so far, the Portuguese superstar met Sampleader ia Genoa with the oa in the evening.
Fleetwood Mac co-founder Peter Green died
His life was like a roller ercoaster ride: After a rapid climb cent FleetetMac Mac it went steeply downhill and then slowly up again.
Now the bluesrock guitarist Peter Green has died at the age of 73.
Ingenious guitarist, drug junkjunk, cult pendant: The co-founder of the band Fleetwood Mac, Peter Green, is dead.
He had peacefully efully his sleep at the age of 73, family members said in Saturday official statement on statement that another statement would be announced for the next few days.
Top musicians like Peter Frampton recognized Green as one of the best blues and rock guitarists.
Mick Fleetwood spoke in an emotional reaction of a "monumental loss" for all previous and current members of the band Fleetwood Mac.
The drummer Fleetwood and the guitarist Green had founded the long-legendary legendary band in London 1967 1967, his dreamy instrumental ental "" batbat" is "to this today.
The life of the musician ("The End Of The Game", "In The Skies") was bled to a roller ercoaster ride.
With Fleetwood Mac, Green experienced a rapid rise - the band celebrated their greatest successes successthen without him.
There other said, there have been disputes among among other, because Green wanted to donate all the profits of the profits for charity.
He began to appear in large roments and with a large crucifix.
Psychental problems are also said to have played a role.
Three years after its founding, Green left the band in 1970.
This was followed by a social descent.
The bluesrock guitarist suffered from drug abuse and schizophrenia, as biographers reported.
Green was treated in psychiatry for a long ry.
During most of the 1970s, the musician disappeared from the scene.
He is said to have lived on the street, worked as a cemetery gardener and spent a time in an Israeli kibbutz.
Green was born in 1946 in the son of Green Green Green Green, the son of Bethworkworking-class London.
At a young age he was enthusiastic about US blumusicians such as B.B. King and Muddy Waters.
At the age of eleven he learned the first guitar guitar.
At the age of 15, the teenager began playing guitar professionally and five years later he got the chance to be on stage as a lead guitarist for the instrumental band Peter B's Looners.
He was replaced replaced the the ibreakbreakEric Clhis idol Eric Clbreakton.
In the middle of the blues boom, Green founded Fleetwood Mac Mac the summer of 1967 1967 along with his bluesbreaker colleagues Mick Fleetwood and John McVie.
The song "Albatross" composed by Green gave the group the first number 1 hit in the winter of 1968 / 69 and catapulted them to the top of the British music scene.
But the rapid assoon showed his dark sides: Green did not cope cope the media bustle, his experiments with the drug SD SD became increasingly extreme.
He later commented on the life between music and addiction in an interview: "worst thing that happened to me in life is the drugs - the best was to land a number 1 hit".
Towards the end of the decade, Green surpr, Green success in success with an album inspired by religious themes.
Fleetwood Mac swam on a wave of success success in new formation.
Their 1977 album "Rumours" sold more than 40 million copies worldwide.
Despite various small solo successes, Green did not make a comcomeback until he he started with 1996 group of friendly musicians in 1996.
The British Daily Telegraph spoke of a rock star returned to Earth.
Frevon Dru, Green released several albums with the Peter Green Splinter Group until the band disbanded in 2004.
For music experts, he was already a blues legend during his lifetime and and with his sound sound one of the most influential guitarists of the past decades.
